Tennessee, session 114, SB1775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-44-110(e), is amended by deleting
"and" at the end of subdivision (8), by deleting the period at the end of subdivision (9) and
substituting ";", and by adding the following as new subdivisions:
(10) The governing body of a local education agency (LEA); and
(11) Any other local governing body of a public body as defined in § 8-44-
102(b)(1)(A) that has the authority to make binding decisions or the ability to appropriate
funds.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1775
011627
- 1 -